Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.260

Civil penalties and/or denial, suspension, or revocation of license, registration or permit.

The director is authorized to impose a civil penalty and/or deny, suspend, or revoke any license, registration or permit provided for in this chapter subject to a hearing and in conformance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act) in any case in which the director finds there has been a failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 1989 c 380 s 23; 1985 c 158 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 26.]